Massachusetts, session 194th, H2689.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Chapter 148 of the General Laws is amended by adding Paragraphs (a)
through (i) as a new Section 26F3/4.
(a) "Fuel gas alarm/detector" means an alarm device that is certified by an independent
third-party and that; (i) complies with UL 1484 standards for residential devices for the detection
of explosive quantities of methane and propane gases or; (ii) complies with UL 2075 standards
for commercial devices for the detection of explosive quantities of methane and propane gases,
unless such standards are superseded by rules adopted by the board of fire prevention
regulations; and (iii) has ETL or UL labeling. Said ETL or UTL labeling shall be visible on all
fuel gas alarms/detectors for inspection purposes.
(b) Every dwelling, building or structure, including those owned or operated by the
commonwealth, occupied in whole or in part for residential or commercial purposes, that:
contains equipment including, but not limited to, a furnace, boiler, water heater, fireplace or any
of 3

other apparatus, appliance or device that burns an explosive gas shall be equipped by the owner
with working, approved fuel gas alarm/detector in conformance with the requirements of the
board of fire prevention regulations; provided, however, that such requirements shall include, but
not be limited to, a requirement that a landlord or superintendent shall install either approved
monitored interconnected, battery-powered alarms or approved electrical wiring alarms as
defined by the board, as are required to make the alarms operational at the beginning of any
rental period by lease or otherwise and shall maintain, an end-of-life indicator, and, if necessary,
replace batteries or such battery-operated or electric hardwired fuel gas alarm/detector annually
thereafter to insure their continued operability.
(c) The board of fire prevention regulations shall promulgate such regulations as may be
necessary to effectuate this section including, but not limited to, the type, installation, location,
maintenance and inspectional requirements of fuel gas alarms/detectors, a standardized
certification form for installers pursuant to subsection (i), and a phased-compliance timeline
pursuant to subsection (j)..
(d) Every dwelling, building or structure, occupied in whole or in part for residential or
commercial purposes, shall, upon sale or transfer of such dwelling, building or structure, be
inspected by the head of the fire department for compliance with the requirements of this section.
(e) The state building code may impose stricter fuel gas alarm/detector requirements for
(i) multifamily dwellings, including but not limited to requiring separate systems for common
areas and units in multifamily buildings; and (ii) new construction or dwellings, buildings, or
structures substantially renovated so as to constitute the equivalent of new construction,
including requiring interconnected alarms. Every such dwelling building or structure, occupied
of 3

in whole or in part for residential or commercial purposes, shall, upon sale or transfer of such
dwelling, building or structure, be inspected by the head of the fire department for compliance
with the fuel gas alarm/detector requirements of the state building code in effect on the date of
the issuance of the relevant building permit.
(f) The department of public health shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be
necessary to effectuate subsection (a) into the state sanitary code as established under section
127A of chapter 111.
(g) All fuel gas alarms/detectors shall be installed in accordance with NFPA 715,
Standard for the Installation of Fuel Gases Detection and Warning Equipment. To ensure proper
installation in accordance with this subsection, installers of fuel gas alarms shall be required to
complete installation training certifications.
(h) Any installer that installs a fuel gas alarm/detector pursuant to this act shall be
required to submit a standardized certification form to the local government and fire department
in the municipality in which the dwelling, building or structure, occupied in whole or in part for
residential or commercial purposes, is located.
(i) Within 18 to 24 months of the promulgation of regulations pursuant to subsections (b)
and (f), fuel gas alarms/detectors shall be installed pursuant to subsection (a). The installation of
said fuel gas alarms/detectors shall follow a risk-based phased compliance timeline developed by
the board of fire prevention regulations.
of 3